Illinois, session 104th, HB1582.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Tobacco Products Manufacturers' Escrow 5Enforcement Act of 2003 is amended by changing Section 30 as 6follows: 7    (30 ILCS 167/30)8    Sec. 30. Penalties and other remedies. 9    (a) In addition to or in lieu of any other civil or 10criminal remedy provided by law, upon a determination that a 11distributor has violated subsection (e) of Section 15 or any 12regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the Director may revoke 13or suspend the license of any distributor in the manner 14provided by Section 6 of the Cigarette Tax Act, Section 6 of 15the Cigarette Use Tax Act, or Section 10-25 of the Tobacco 16Products Tax Act of 1995, as appropriate. Each stamp affixed 17and each offer to sell cigarettes in violation of subsection 18(e) of Section 15 shall constitute a separate violation. For 19each violation, the Director may also impose a civil penalty 20in an amount not to exceed the greater of 500% of the retail 21value of the cigarettes sold or $5,000 upon a determination of 22violation of subsection (e) of Section 15 or any regulations 23adopted pursuant thereto.  HB1582 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1    (b) Any cigarettes that have been sold, offered for sale, 2or possessed for sale in this State, or imported for personal 3consumption in this State in violation of subsection (e) of 4Section 15 shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture as 5provided in Sections 18, 18a, and 20 of the Cigarette Tax Act 6and Sections 24, 25, 25a and 26 of the Cigarette Use Tax Act, 7and all cigarettes so seized and forfeited shall be destroyed 8and not resold.9    (c) The Attorney General may seek an injunction to 10restrain a threatened or actual violation of subsection (e) of 11Section 15, subsection (a) of Section 25, or subsection (d) of 12Section 25 by a distributor and to compel the distributor to 13comply with such subsections. In any action brought pursuant 14to this Section, the State shall be entitled to recover the 15costs of investigation, costs of the action, and reasonable 16attorney fees.17    (c-5) Upon a distributor's failure to submit information 18as required by subsection (a) of Section 25 or subsection (d) 19of Section 25, the Attorney General may send a notice of 20violation to the distributor and provide the distributor with 2110 days to cure the violation. If the distributor does not cure 22the violation, the Attorney General may notify the Director of 23the violation, and, upon receiving the Attorney General's 24notice, the Director shall revoke the distributor's license. 25    (d) It shall be unlawful for a person to: (i) sell or 26distribute cigarettes; or (ii) acquire, hold, own, possess,   HB1582 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1transport, import, or cause to be imported cigarettes that the 2person knows or should know are intended for distribution or 3sale in the State in violation of subsection (e) of Section 15. 4A violation of this Section shall be a Class 2 felony.5    (e) A person who violates subsection (e) of Section 15 6engages in an unfair and deceptive trade practice in violation 7of the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.8(Source: P.A. 93-446, eff. 1-1-04; 93-930, eff. 1-1-05; 994-575, eff. 8-12-05.) 10    Section 10. The Tobacco Product Manufacturers' Escrow Act 11is amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 168/15)13    Sec. 15. Requirements. 14    (a) Any tobacco product manufacturer selling cigarettes to 15consumers within the State of Illinois (whether directly or 16through a distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary or 17intermediaries) after the effective date of this Act shall do 18one of the following: 19        (1) become a participating manufacturer (as that term 20    is defined in Section II(jj)  of the Master Settlement 21    Agreement) and generally perform its financial obligations 22    under the Master Settlement Agreement; or 23        (2) (A) place into a qualified escrow fund by April 15 24        of the year following the year in question the   HB1582 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1        following amounts (as such amounts are adjusted for 2        inflation): 3                (i) For 1999: $0.0094241 per unit sold after 4            the effective date of this Act; 5                (ii) For 2000: $0.0104712 per unit sold; 6                (iii) For each of 2001 and 2002: $0.0136125 7            per unit sold; 8                (iv) For each of 2003 through 2006: $0.0167539 9            per unit sold; 10                (v) For each of 2007 and each year thereafter: 11            $0.0188482 per unit sold. 12            (B) A tobacco product manufacturer that places 13        funds into escrow pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(A) 14        shall receive the interest or other appreciation on 15        the funds as earned. The funds themselves shall be 16        released from escrow only under the following 17        circumstances: 18                (i) to pay a judgment or settlement on any 19            released claim brought against the tobacco product 20            manufacturer by the State or any releasing party 21            located or residing in the State. Funds shall be 22            released from escrow under this subdivision 23            (a)(2)(B)(i): (I) in the order in which they were 24            placed into escrow; and (II) only to the extent 25            and at the time necessary to make payments 26            required under such judgment or settlement;   HB1582 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1                (ii) to the extent that a tobacco product 2            manufacturer establishes that the amount it was 3            required to place into escrow on account of units 4            sold in the State in a particular year was greater 5            than the Master Settlement Agreement payments, as 6            determined pursuant to Section IX(i) of that 7            Agreement, including after final determination of 8            all adjustments, that such manufacturer would have 9            been required to make on account of such units 10            sold had it been a Participating Manufacturer, the 11            excess shall be released from escrow and revert 12            back to such tobacco product manufacturer; or 13                (iii) to the extent not released from escrow 14            under subdivisions (a)(2)(B)(i) or (a)(2)(B)(ii), 15            funds shall be released from escrow and revert 16            back to such tobacco product manufacturer 25 years 17            after the date on which they were placed into 18            escrow. 19            (C) Each tobacco product manufacturer that elects 20        to place funds into escrow pursuant to this 21        subdivision (a)(2) shall annually certify to the 22        Attorney General that it is in compliance with this 23        subdivision (a)(2). The Attorney General may bring a 24        civil action on behalf of the State of Illinois 25        against any tobacco product manufacturer that fails to 26        place into escrow the funds required under this   HB1582 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1        subdivision (a)(2). Any tobacco product manufacturer 2        that fails in any year to place into escrow the funds 3        required under this subdivision (a)(2) shall: 4                (i) be required within 15 days to place such 5            funds into escrow as shall bring it into 6            compliance with this Section. The court, upon a 7            finding of a violation of this subdivision (a)(2), 8            may impose a civil penalty to be paid into the 9            General Revenue Fund in an amount not to exceed 5% 10            of the amount improperly withheld from escrow per 11            day of the violation and in a total amount not to 12            exceed 100% of the original amount improperly 13            withheld from escrow; 14                (ii) in the case of a knowing violation, be 15            required within 15 days to place such funds into 16            escrow as shall bring it into compliance with this 17            Section. The court, upon a finding of a knowing 18            violation of this subdivision (a)(2), may impose a 19            civil penalty to be paid into the General Revenue 20            Fund in an amount not to exceed 15% of the amount 21            improperly withheld from escrow per day of the 22            violation and in a total amount not to exceed 300% 23            of the original amount improperly withheld from 24            escrow; and 25                (iii) in the case of a second knowing 26            violation, be prohibited from selling cigarettes   HB1582 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1            to consumers within the State of Illinois (whether 2            directly or through a distributor, retailer, or 3            similar intermediary) for a period not to exceed 2 4            years.5    (b) Each failure to make an annual deposit required under 6this Section shall constitute a separate violation. If a 7tobacco product manufacturer is successfully prosecuted by the 8Attorney General for a violation of subdivision (a)(2), the 9tobacco product manufacturer must pay, in addition to any fine 10imposed by a court, the State's costs and attorney's fees 11incurred in the prosecution.12    (c) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of item (2) of 13subsection (a) of this Section, a tobacco product manufacturer 14that elects to place funds into escrow pursuant to 15subparagraph (A) of item (2) of subsection (a) of this Section 16may make an irrevocable assignment of its interest in the 17funds to the benefit of the State. The assignment shall be 18permanent and shall apply to all funds that are in the escrow 19account or that may subsequently come into the account, 20including (i) those funds deposited into the escrow account 21before the assignment is executed, (ii) those funds deposited 22into the escrow account on or after the date the assignment is 23executed, and (iii) interest or other appreciation on the 24funds. The tobacco product manufacturer, the Attorney General, 25and the financial institution where the escrow account is 26maintained may make amendments to the qualified escrow account   HB1582 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1agreement as necessary to effectuate an assignment of rights 2executed pursuant to this subsection or a withdrawal of moneys 3from the escrow account pursuant to subparagraph (B) of item 4(2) of subsection (a) of this Section. An assignment of rights 5executed pursuant to this subsection shall be in writing, 6shall be signed by a duly authorized representative of the 7tobacco product manufacturer making the assignment, and shall 8become effective on delivery of the assignment to the Attorney 9General and the financial institution where the escrow account 10is maintained. An assignment of escrow funds shall not be made 11by a tobacco product manufacturer unless and until the 12Attorney General provides written approval to the tobacco 13product manufacturer. 14    (d) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of item (2) of 15subsection (a) of this Section, any escrow funds assigned to 16the State pursuant to subsection (c) shall be withdrawn by the 17State on the approval of the Attorney General. Any funds 18withdrawn pursuant to this subsection shall be used to 19reimburse the State for Medicaid costs and shall be calculated 20on a dollar-for-dollar basis as a credit against any judgment 21or settlement described in subparagraph (B) of item (2) of 22subsection (a) of this Section that may be obtained against 23the tobacco product manufacturer that has assigned the funds 24in the escrow account. This Section does not relieve a tobacco 25product manufacturer from any past, current, or future 26obligations that the manufacturer may have pursuant to this   HB1582 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 06249 HLH 16284 b1Section. 2    (e) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of item (2) of 3subsection (a) of this Section, if, after more than one year 4from the date of release, the escrow amount has not been 5subject to a request by the tobacco product manufacturer who 6made the deposit or currently owns the rights to the account, 7the Attorney General may send a notice of intent to assign 8giving the entity 10 days to make an application for release in 9the manner established by the Attorney General. If, after the 10expiration of that 10-day period, no application has been 11received, the Attorney General may send a notice of assignment 12to the last known contact, and if no application is received 13after the expiration of that 10-day period, the Attorney 14General may provide notice to the escrow bank that the funds 15shall be transferred to the State. 16(Source: P.A. 93-446, eff. 1-1-04.)